Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.64.030

Child selling—Child buying.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell or purchase a minor child.

(2) A transaction shall not be a purchase or sale under subsection (1) of this section if any of the following exists:

(a) The transaction is between the parents of the minor child; or

(b) The transaction is between a person receiving or to receive the child and an agency recognized under RCW 26.33.020; or

(c) The transaction is between the person receiving or to receive the child and a state agency or other governmental agency; or

(d) The transaction is pursuant to chapter 26.34 RCW; or

(e) The transaction is pursuant to court order; or

(f) The only consideration paid by the person receiving or to receive the child is intended to pay for the prenatal hospital or medical expenses involved in the birth of the child, or attorneys' fees and court costs involved in effectuating transfer of child custody.

(3)(a) Child selling is a class C felony.

(b) Child buying is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 81; 1985 c 7 s 3; 1980 c 85 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1980 c 85: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 85 s 5.]